da: Hovedingrediens i æggeerstatning: Algemel; Æblepurépulver; Aquafabapulver; Pilerodspulver; Bananpulver; Chiafrø; Kikærtemel; Majsstivelse; Hestebønneprotein; Hørfrø; Hampfrø; Linsemel; Mungbønneprotein; Ærteprotein; Kartoffelstivelse; Rismel; Sojaprotein; Tapiokastivelse; Hvedegluten; Yamsmel; Andet
bg-BG: Основна съставка на заместител на яйца: Брашно от водорасли; Ябълково пюре на прах; Аквафаба на прах; Брашно от арарут; Банан на прах; Семена от чиа; Брашно от нахут; Царевично нишесте; Протеин от бакла; Ленено семе; Конопено семе; Брашно от леща; Протеин от боб мунг; Грахов протеин; Картофено нишесте; Оризово брашно; Соев протеин; Нишесте от тапиока; Пшеничен глутен; Брашно от ямс; Друго
it: Ingrediente principale del sostituto dell'uovo: Farina di alghe; Purea di mela in polvere; Aquafaba in polvere; Fecola di maranta; Banana in polvere; Semi di chia; Farina di ceci; Amido di mais; Proteine di fava; Semi di lino; Semi di canapa; Farina di lenticchie; Proteine di fagiolo mungo; Proteine del pisello; Fecola di patate; Farina di riso; Proteine della soia; Amido di tapioca; Glutine di frumento; Farina di igname; Altro
cs: Hlavní složka náhražky vajec: Řasová mouka; Prášek z jablečného pyré; Aquafaba v prášku; Marantový prášek; Banánový prášek; Chia semínka; Cizrnová mouka; Kukuřičný škrob; Protein z bobu obecného; Lněné semínko; Konopné semínko; Čočková mouka; Protein z fazolí mungo; Hrachový protein; Bramborový škrob; Rýžová mouka; Sójový protein; Tapiokový škrob; Pšeničný lepek; Mouka z jamů; Jiné
en: Egg replacer main ingredient: Algal flour; Apple puree powder; Aquafaba powder; Arrowroot powder; Banana powder; Chia seed; Chickpea flour; Corn starch; Fava bean protein; Flaxseed; Hemp seed; Lentil flour; Mung bean protein; Pea protein; Potato starch; Rice flour; Soy protein; Tapioca starch; Wheat gluten; Yam flour; Other
de: Hauptbestandteil des Eiersatzes: Algenmehl; Apfelpüree-Pulver; Aquafaba-Pulver; Pfeilwurzelmehl; Bananenpulver; Chiasamen; Kichererbsenmehl; Maisstärke; Ackerbohnenprotein; Leinsamen; Hanfsamen; Linsenmehl; Mungbohnenprotein; Erbsenprotein; Kartoffelstärke; Reismehl; Sojaprotein; Tapiokastärke; Weizengluten; Yamsmehl; Sonstige
sl-SI: Glavna sestavina nadomestka za jajca: Moka iz alg; Jabolčni pire v prahu; Akvafaba v prahu; Maranta v prahu; Banana v prahu; Semena chia; Čičerikina moka; Koruzni škrob; Beljakovine boba; Laneno seme; Konopljino seme; Lečina moka; Beljakovine fižola mung; Grahove beljakovine; Krompirjev škrob; Riževa moka; Sojine beljakovine; Tapiokin škrob; Pšenični gluten; Jamova moka; Drugo
ro-RO: Ingredientul principal al înlocuitorului de ouă: Făină de alge; Piure de mere pudră; Pudră de aquafaba; Pudră de arrowroot; Pudră de banane; Semințe de chia; Făină de năut; Amidon de porumb; Proteine din fasole fava; Semințe de in; Semințe de cânepă; Făină de linte; Proteine din fasole mung; Proteine din mazăre; Amidon de cartofi; Făină de orez; Proteine din soia; Amidon de tapioca; Gluten de grâu; Făină de igname; Altele
zh-TW: 雞蛋替代品主要成分: 海藻粉; 蘋果泥粉; 鷹嘴豆水粉; 葛鬱金粉; 香蕉粉; 奇亞籽; 鷹嘴豆粉; 玉米澱粉; 蠶豆蛋白; 亞麻籽; 大麻籽; 扁豆粉; 綠豆蛋白; 豌豆蛋白; 馬鈴薯澱粉; 米粉; 大豆蛋白; 木薯澱粉; 小麥麩質; 山藥粉; 其他
pl: Główny składnik zamiennika jaj: Mąka z alg; Mus jabłkowy w proszku; Aquafaba w proszku; Mączka z maranty; Proszek bananowy; Nasiona chia; Mąka z ciecierzycy; Skrobia kukurydziana; Białko z bobu; Siemię lniane; Nasiona konopi; Mąka z soczewicy; Białko z fasoli mung; Białko grochu; Skrobia ziemniaczana; Mąka ryżowa; Białko sojowe; Skrobia z tapioki; Gluten pszenny; Mąka z pochrzynu; Inne
sk-SK: Hlavná zložka náhrady vajec: Múka z rias; Jablkové pyré v prášku; Aquafaba v prášku; Prášok z maranty trstinovej (arrowroot); Banánový prášok; Semienka chia; Cícerová múka; Kukuričný škrob; Proteín z bôbu obyčajného; Ľanové semienka; Konopné semienka; Šošovicová múka; Proteín z fazule mungo; Hrachový proteín; Zemiakový škrob; Ryžová múka; Sójový proteín; Tapiokový škrob; Pšeničný glutén; Jamová múka; Iné
th: ส่วนผสมหลักของสารทดแทนไข่: แป้งสาหร่าย; ผงแอปเปิลบด; ผงอควาฟาบา; ผงท้าวยายม่อม; ผงกล้วย; เมล็ดเจีย; แป้งถั่วลูกไก่; แป้งข้าวโพด; โปรตีนถั่วปากอ้า; เมล็ดแฟลกซ์; เมล็ดเฮมพ์; แป้งถั่วเลนทิล; โปรตีนถั่วเขียว; โปรตีนถั่วลันเตา; แป้งมันฝรั่ง; แป้งข้าวเจ้า; โปรตีนถั่วเหลือง; แป้งมันสำปะหลัง; กลูเตนข้าวสาลี; แป้งมันเทศ; อื่นๆ
hu: A tojáspótló fő összetevője: Algaliszt; Almapürépor; Aquafabapor; Nyílgyökérpor; Banánpor; Chiamag; Csicseriborsóliszt; Kukoricakeményítő; Lóbabfehérje; Lenmag; Kendermag; Lencseliszt; Mungóbabfehérje; Borsófehérje; Burgonyakeményítő; Rizsliszt; Szójafehérje; Tapiókakeményítő; Búzaglutén (szejtán); Jamgyökérliszt; Egyéb
nl: Eivervanger hoofdingrediënt: Algenmeel; Appelmoespoeder; Aquafabapoeder; Arrowrootpoeder; Bananenpoeder; Chiazaad; Kikkererwtenmeel; Maïszetmeel; Tuinbooneiwit; Lijnzaad; Hennepzaad; Linzenmeel; Mungbooneiwit; Erwteneiwit; Aardappelzetmeel; Rijstmeel; Soja-eiwit; Tapiocazetmeel; Tarwegluten; Yam-meel; Overige
fi: Munankorvikkeen pääraaka-aine: Leväjauho; Omenasosejauhe; Aquafaba-jauhe; Nuolijuurijauhe; Banaanijauhe; Chiansiemen; Kikhernejauho; Maissitärkkelys; Härkäpapuproteiini; Pellavansiemen; Hampunsiemen; Linssijauho; Mungpapuproteiini; Herneproteiini; Perunatärkkelys; Riisijauho; Soijaproteiini; Tapiokatärkkelys; Vehnägluteeni; Jamssijauho; Muu
pt-BR: Ingrediente principal do substituto de ovo: Farinha de algas; Purê de maçã em pó; Aquafaba em pó; Araruta em pó; Banana em pó; Semente de chia; Farinha de grão-de-bico; Amido de milho; Proteína de fava; Linhaça; Semente de cânhamo; Farinha de lentilha; Proteína de feijão-mungo; Proteína de ervilha; Fécula de batata; Farinha de arroz; Proteína de soja; Fécula de tapioca; Glúten de trigo; Farinha de inhame; Outro
sv: Huvudingrediens i äggersättning: Algmjöl; Äppelpurépulver; Aquafabapulver; Pilarotspulver; Bananpulver; Chiafrön; Kikärtsmjöl; Majsstärkelse; Bondbönsprotein; Linfrö; Hampafrö; Linsmjöl; Mungbönsprotein; Ärtprotein; Potatisstärkelse; Rismjöl; Sojaprotein; Tapiokastärkelse; Vetegluten; Jamsmjöl; Övrigt
zh-CN: 蛋制品替代品主料: 海藻粉; 苹果泥粉; 鹰嘴豆汁粉; 葛根粉; 香蕉粉; 奇亚籽; 鹰嘴豆粉; 玉米淀粉; 蚕豆蛋白; 亚麻籽; 火麻籽; 扁豆粉; 绿豆蛋白; 豌豆蛋白; 马铃薯淀粉; 米粉; 大豆蛋白; 木薯淀粉; 小麦面筋; 山药粉; 其他
tr: Yumurta ikamesi kullanılan ana bileşen: Yosun unu; Elma püresi tozu; Aquafaba tozu; Ararot tozu; Muz tozu; Chia tohumu; Nohut unu; Mısır nişastası; Bakla proteini; Keten tohumu; Kenevir tohumu; Mercimek unu; Maş fasulyesi proteini; Bezelye proteini; Patates nişastası; Pirinç unu; Soya proteini; Tapyoka nişastası; Buğday gluteni; Yam unu; Diğer
lt-LT: Pagrindinis kiaušinių pakaitalo ingredientas: Dumblių miltai; Obuolių tyrės milteliai; Akvafo milteliai; Marantų milteliai; Bananų milteliai; Ispaninio šalavijo sėklos; Avinžirnių miltai; Kukurūzų krakmolas; Pupų baltymai; Linų sėmenys; Kanapių sėklos; Lęšių miltai; Spindulinių pupuolių baltymai; Žirnių baltymai; Bulvių krakmolas; Ryžių miltai; Sojų baltymai; Tapijokos krakmolas; Kviečių glitimas; Jamsų miltai; Kita
ja: 卵代替品の主成分: 藻類粉末; アップルピューレパウダー; アクアファバパウダー; クズウコン粉; バナナパウダー; チアシード; ひよこ豆粉; コーンスターチ; そら豆プロテイン; 亜麻仁; ヘンプシード; レンズ豆粉; 緑豆プロテイン; ピープロテイン; 片栗粉; 米粉; ソイプロテイン; タピオカスターチ; 小麦グルテン; 山芋粉; その他
pt-PT: Ingrediente principal do substituto do ovo: Farinha de algas; Puré de maçã em pó; Aquafaba em pó; Araruta em pó; Banana em pó; Semente de chia; Farinha de grão-de-bico; Amido de milho; Proteína de fava; Semente de linhaça; Semente de cânhamo; Farinha de lentilha; Proteína de feijão-mungo; Proteína de ervilha; Fécula de batata; Farinha de arroz; Proteína de soja; Amido de tapioca; Glúten de trigo; Farinha de inhame; Outro
ru: Основной ингредиент заменителя яйца: Водорослевая мука; Порошок яблочного пюре; Порошок аквафабы; Порошок аррорута; Банановый порошок; Семена чиа; Нутовая мука; Кукурузный крахмал; Белок бобов фава; Льняное семя; Конопляное семя; Чечевичная мука; Белок маша; Гороховый белок; Картофельный крахмал; Рисовая мука; Соевый белок; Тапиоковый крахмал; Пшеничный глютен; Ямсовая мука; Другое
ko: 계란 대체재의 주요 성분: 해조 가루; 사과 퓌레 분말; 아쿠아파바 분말; 칡 전분; 바나나 분말; 치아시드; 병아리콩 가루; 옥수수 전분; 잠두콩 단백질; 아마씨; 햄프시드; 렌틸콩 가루; 녹두 단백질; 완두콩 단백질; 감자 전분; 쌀가루; 대두 단백질; 타피오카 전분; 밀 글루텐; 얌 가루; 기타
es: Ingrediente principal del sustituto de huevo: Harina de algas; Polvo de puré de manzana; Polvo de aquafaba; Polvo de arrurruz; Polvo de plátano; Semilla de chía; Harina de garbanzo; Almidón de maíz; Proteína de haba; Linaza; Semilla de cáñamo; Harina de lentejas; Proteína de frijol mungo; Proteína de guisante; Almidón de papa; Harina de arroz; Proteína de soya; Almidón de tapioca; Gluten de trigo; Harina de ñame; Otro
vi: Thành phần chính của chất thay thế trứng: Bột tảo; Bột táo xay nhuyễn; Bột aquafaba; Bột dong riềng; Bột chuối; Hạt chia; Bột đậu gà; Bột ngô; Protein đậu fava; Hạt lanh; Hạt gai dầu; Bột đậu lăng; Protein đậu xanh; Protein đậu Hà Lan; Tinh bột khoai tây; Bột gạo; Protein đậu nành; Tinh bột sắn; Gluten lúa mì; Bột khoai mỡ; Khác
el: Κύριο συστατικό υποκατάστατου αυγού: Αλεύρι φυκιών; Πούδρα πουρέ μήλου; Πούδρα aquafaba; Σκόνη αραρούτι; Σκόνη μπανάνας; Σπόροι chia; Αλεύρι ρεβιθιού; Άμυλο καλαμποκιού; Πρωτεΐνη φάβας; Λιναρόσπορος; Σπόροι κάνναβης; Αλεύρι φακής; Πρωτεΐνη ροβίτσας; Πρωτεΐνη μπιζελιού; Άμυλο πατάτας; Ρυζάλευρο; Πρωτεΐνη σόγιας; Άμυλο ταπιόκας; Γλουτένη σίτου; Αλεύρι γιαμ; Άλλο
nb: Hovedingrediens i eggerstatning: Algemel; Eplepurépulver; Aquafaba-pulver; Pilerotpulver; Bananpulver; Chiafrø; Kikkertmel; Maisstivelse; Bondebønneprotein; Linfrø; Hampfrø; Linsemel; Mungbønneprotein; Erteprotein; Potetstivelse; Rismel; Soyaprotein; Tapiokastivelse; Hvetegluten; Yamsmel; Annet
hr-HR: Glavni sastojak zamjene za jaja: Brašno od algi; Prah pirea od jabuke; Aquafaba prah; Maranta prah; Prah banane; Chia sjemenke; Brašno od slanutka; Kukuruzni škrob; Protein boba; Lanene sjemenke; Sjemenke konoplje; Brašno od leće; Protein mung graha; Protein graška; Krumpirov škrob; Rižino brašno; Protein soje; Škrob tapioke; Pšenični gluten; Brašno od yama; Ostalo
fr: Ingrédient principal du substitut d’œuf: Farine d’algues; Poudre de compote de pommes; Poudre d’aquafaba; Poudre d’arrow-root; Poudre de banane; Graines de chia; Farine de pois chiche; Fécule de maïs; Protéine de fève; Graines de lin; Graines de chanvre; Farine de lentilles; Protéine de haricot mungo; Protéine de pois; Fécule de pomme de terre; Farine de riz; Protéine de soja; Fécule de tapioca; Gluten de blé; Farine d’igname; Autre